Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.200

Post-placement report—Requirements—Exception—Fees.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 26.33.220, at the time the petition for adoption is filed, the court shall order a post-placement report made to determine the nature and adequacy of the placement and to determine if the placement is in the best interest of the child. The report shall be prepared by an agency, the department, an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court employee appointed by the court. A certificate signed under penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or filed with each post-placement report. The report shall be in writing and contain all reasonably available information concerning the physical and mental condition of the child, home environment, family life, health, facilities and resources of the petitioners, and any other facts and circumstances relating to the propriety and advisability of the adoption. The report shall also include, if relevant, information on the child's special cultural heritage, including membership in any Indian tribe or band. The report shall be filed within sixty days of the date of appointment, unless the time is extended by the court. The preplacement report shall be made available to the person appointed to make the post-placement report.

(2) A fee may be charged for preparation of the post-placement report in the same manner as for a preplacement report under RCW 26.33.190.

[ 1990 c 146 s 4; 1984 c 155 s 20.]